District of Columbia statutes.
47-1814.07

Repealed

Certain suits forbidden.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, ch. 258, art. I, title XIV, § 8
as added Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 103(f), 39 DCR 4895
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1243(b), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-1814.7.